District of Columbia statutes.
31-4501

Filing requirements; approval by Commissioner of certain conditions.

(a)

A foreign or alien insurance company desiring to transact business in the District shall file with the Commissioner:

(1)

Its application for certificate of authority, stating the kind or kinds of insurance it proposes to transact;

(2)

A copy of its charter, articles of incorporation, or deed or settlement, certified by the official who is required to keep or record the same in the state under whose laws the company is incorporated, or if organized under the laws of a foreign government, province, or state, by the proper official of such government, province, or state;

(3)

A copy of its bylaws, or regulations, if any, certified to by the secretary of the company;

(4)

Copies of the policies it is issuing or proposes to issue and of the applications therefor;

(5)

Proof of compliance with the service of process requirements of § 31-202; and

(6)

A statement of its financial condition and business, in form as prescribed by law for annual statements, signed and sworn to by the president and secretary or other principal officers of the company. If an alien company, the statement shall comprise only its condition and business in the United States, and shall be signed and sworn to by its United States manager.

(b)

It shall satisfy the Commissioner that the company is duly organized under the laws of the state, province, or government under whose laws it professes to be organized, and authorized to do the business it is transacting or proposes to transact, and that its name is not identical with, nor so similar to, that of another company organized prior to the organization of the applying company as to lead to confusion.

(c)

It shall satisfy the Commissioner that its funds are invested in accordance with the laws of its domicile and in securities or property which afford a degree of financial security substantially equal to that required for similar domestic companies, and, if a stock company, that it has paid-up capital and surplus at least equal to the capital and surplus required of domestic stock companies, or, if a mutual company, that it has a surplus at least equal to that required by this subdivision for domestic mutual companies.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1154, ch. 672, ch. IV, § 1
May 4, 1950, 64 Stat. 104, ch. 157, § 6
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-233, § 4, 42 DCR 24
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(l), 44 DCR 1730
Application of chapter to existing companies, see § 31-4420.
Deposits of domestic companies, see § 31-4315 et seq.
Foreign or alien fraternal benefit society, admission, see § 31-5326.
This section is referenced in § 31-5326.
1981 Ed., § 35-701.
1973 Ed., § 35-601.
Department of Insurance abolished: The Department of Insurance, including the Superintendent, was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 43, dated June 23, 1953, as amended, established, under the direction and control of a Commissioner, a Department of Insurance headed by a Superintendent. The Order provided for the organization of the Department, abolished the previously existing Department of Insurance, and provided that all functions and positions of the previous Department would be transferred to the new Department of Insurance, including the duties, powers, and authorities of all officers and employees; and that all personnel, property, records and unexpended balances relating to the functions and positions transferred would also be transferred to the new Department. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. The functions of the Superintendent of Insurance were transferred to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983. Pursuant to the provisions of D.C. Law 11-268, the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation was established and the duties of the Superintendent of Insurance and the Insurance Administration were assumed by the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities, and the Insurance Administration in the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs was abolished.